Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,126
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Public Elementary and Secondary Student Fee Authorization Act:

(1) Extracurricular activities means student activities or organizations which are supervised or administered by the school district, which do not count toward graduation or advancement between grades, and in which participation is not otherwise required by the school district;

(2) Governing body means a school board of any class of school district or an educational service unit board; and

(3) Postsecondary education costs means tuition and other fees associated with obtaining credit from a postsecondary educational institution. For a course in which students receive high school credit and for which they may also choose to apply for postsecondary education credit, the course shall be offered without charge for tuition, transportation, books, or other fees, except that if the student chooses to apply for postsecondary education credit, he or she may be charged tuition and other fees only associated with obtaining credits from a postsecondary educational institution.

Laws 2002, LB 1172, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 249, § 3.